Maryland, session 2025, HB1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–108.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE” MEANS THE LOSS OF 50%
OR MORE OF CROPS FROM A SINGLE FIELD.
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT DEER HAVE CAUSED
CATASTROPHIC DAMAGE TO A FIELD, THE DEPARTMENT MAY TAKE
EXTRAORDINARY MEASURES TO CONTROL THE LOCAL DEER POPULATION AND
PREVENT FUTURE CROP LOSS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1024*

HOUSE BILL 1024
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.